Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Penalty

15A.990.
Penalty.

Any person who intentionally violates the provisions of KRS

15A.210

to

15A.230

or the administrative regulations issued thereunder shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Each day of violation shall be a separate offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 177, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 136, effective April 10, 1988.